Alabama, session 2026rs, HB340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) ATHLETIC ACTIVITY. The term as defined in Section
16-30D-2, Code of Alabama 1975.
(2) COMPENSATION. Any monetary or in-kind payment to a
student athlete.
Page 1

student athlete.
HB340 INTRODUCED
(3) STUDENT ATHLETE. A student who is enrolled in a
K-12 school and participates in any athletic activity.
(b) No student athlete in this state shall be prevented
from receiving compensation for the use of his or her name,
image, or likeness.
(c) The receipt of compensation by a student athlete
for the use of his or her name, image, or likeness shall be
subject to all of the following requirements:
(1) Compensation may not be:
a. Contingent on specific athletic performance or
achievement.
b. Provided as an incentive to enroll or remain
enrolled at a specific school.
c. Provided by a school or any individual acting as an
agent for a school.
(2) None of the following may be used, worn, or
endorsed in relation to a student athlete receiving
compensation for the use of his or her name, image, or
likeness:
a. Marks, including a school logo, school name, school
mascot, or trademarked logo or acronym of an athletic
association.
b. School apparel or equipment, including a school
uniform or any apparel displaying a trademarked logo or
acronym of an athletic association.
c. A school facility.
d. Activities in conflict with a school's policies,
including the use of tobacco products, alcohol products, or
Page 2

including the use of tobacco products, alcohol products, or
HB340 INTRODUCED
controlled substances.
(3) Prior to receiving compensation as authorized by
this act, a student athlete and a parent or legal guardian of
the student athlete shall receive professional guidance as to
the potential impacts and consequences of receiving the
compensation, including collegiate financial aid and tax
implications.
(4) A student athlete may not receive compensation
pursuant to this section unless the student athlete or a
parent or legal guardian of the student athlete notifies the
principal or athletic director of the student athlete's school
that the student athlete intends to enter into any type of
name, image, or likeness contract or agreement no less than
seven days prior to entering into the contract or agreement.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3